Massachusetts, session 194th, H734.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Legislature shall establish
a commission, hereafter referred to as “the Promise Commission”, the purpose of which is to
study the current status, structures, future vision and needs of public education. Said commission
shall develop a plan to align the Commonwealth’s expectations for public education in the next
decade with demonstrable evidence that students have developed the necessary competencies to
succeed in an ever-evolving world.
SECTION 1. The Promise Commission shall consist of eleven (11) members appointed
as follows: House Speaker or a designee, the Senate President or a designee, the Commissioner
of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Commissioner of Early Education and Care, the
Commissioner of Higher Education, a member appointed by the Massachusetts Association of
School Superintendents, a member appointed by the Massachusetts Association of School
of 2

Committees, a member appointed by the Massachusetts affiliate of the American Federation of
Teachers, a member appointed by the Massachusetts Teachers Association, a member appointed
by the Massachusetts Education Equity Partnership, and a Massachusetts based member
appointed by Latinos for Education.
SECTION 2. The Commission shall conduct an ongoing study of all matters concerning
education in the 21st Century, including but not limited to: educator pipeline (including
recruitment, career development, and retention); educator diversity; improved reputation and
perception of the profession; curriculum and course of studies that meet the needs of students in
a global society regarding technology; flexible learning models beyond traditional “seat time;”
multilingualism as an asset and an aspiration; multiple modes of assessing learning beyond
MCAS; identifying valid and credible high school competency determination paths and methods;
broader methods used for accountability that are ambitious, attainable, and compassionate;
reexamination of charter schools as part of the accountability system; and structures that take
students from pre-K through college and provide the wrap-around social/emotional and
education coaching at each age. With these and other goals, the Commission will dive deep into
best practices found in other states and other countries.
SECTION 3.The Promise Commission shall develop a comprehensive report that
reenvisions the power and potential of the Massachusetts education system for all students who
are in our schools and who will be in our schools for years to come.
SECTION 4. Said commission shall report its findings to the secretary of education, the
clerks of the house and senate,and the committees on ways and means and education arts and
humanities by no later than March 1, 2026
of 2